Vermont, session 2025-2026, H762.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 118, Sec. 1 is amended to read:
Sec. 1. COUNTY AND REGIONAL GOVERNANCE STUDY
COMMITTEE; REPORT
(a) Creation Legislative intent and creation of Committee.
(1) Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly that
existing direct coordination and communication between the State and
Vermont municipalities should be retained or strengthened. County or regional
governance should enhance the work of local and State governments and not
become a procedural barrier between the State and municipalities.
(2) Creation of Committee. There is created the County and Regional
Governance Study Committee to address local government capacity
challenges, enhance and optimize public safety, regional collaboration and
planning, efficient, equitable, and transparent public resource allocation, and
effective regional public services for individuals and municipalities.
(b) Membership. The Committee shall be, to the extent possible, composed
of members from geographically diverse regions of the State. The Committee
shall elect its chair from among its members. The Committee shall be
composed of the following members:
VT LEG #389690 v.1

No. 96 Page 2 of 4
2026
(1) three current members of the House of Representatives, who shall
not all be from the same political party, the first of whom shall be the Chair of
the House Committee on Government Operations and Military Affairs, and the
second and third of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House; and
(2) three current members of the Senate, who shall not all be from the
same political party, the first of whom shall be the Chair of the Senate
Committee on Government Operations, and the second and third of whom
shall be appointed by the Committee on Committees.
(c) Powers and duties.
(1) The Committee shall study and make recommendations to the
General Assembly on how to improve the structure and organization of county
and regional government, including:
(A) enhancement coordination and optimization of public
safety services regional government provided by State, regional, and local
agencies, including for public safety, emergency management, and public
health purposes;
(B) enhancement of regional collaboration and planning and
implementation;
(C) coordination, increased transparency, potential efficiencies, and
service improvements of nongovernmental agencies providing regional public
services, including but not limited to designated mental health agencies and
public transit providers;
VT LEG #389690 v.1

No. 96 Page 3 of 4
2026
(D) efficient, equitable, and transparent allocation of public
resources;
(D)(E) promotion of effective regional public services for individuals
and municipalities;
(E)(F) clarification of review the role and oversight authority of
elected county officials and their departments;
(F)(G) reduction of duplicated or conflicting public services and
promotion of opportunities for intermunicipal collaboration;
(G)(H) balance of availability and cost of services across
municipalities in each county;
(H)(I) review of mechanisms of county and regional government
structures in other states; and
(I)(J) impact of climate change and resiliency on the maintenance of
public infrastructure, delivery of regional government services, and
coordination of regional emergency planning; and
(K) the role of Department of Public Safety and Vermont Emergency
Management in responding to all hazards events.
* * *
(e) Report. On or before November 1, 2025 2027, the Committee shall
report to the House Committee on Government Operations and Military
Affairs and the Senate Committee on Government Operations with its findings
and any recommendations for legislative action.
VT LEG #389690 v.1

No. 96 Page 4 of 4
2026
(f) Meetings.
* * *
(2) The Committee shall be co-chaired by the Chair of the House
Committee on Government Operations and Military Affairs and the Chair of
the Senate Committee on Government Operations. [Repealed.]
* * *
(4) The Committee shall cease to exist on July 1, 2026 November 2,
2027.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: May 13, 2026
VT LEG #389690 v.1